California statutes. Education Code
(ii) Disclosure of case information to the pupil member or members pursuant to clause (i) shall be conditioned on the voluntary,
 written consent of the pupil who is subject to the expulsion hearing and the pupil’s parent or guardian, and shall be consistent with federal and state privacy laws, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and any implementing federal regulations.

(10) A pupil member shall not be included in determining the vote required to carry any measure before the governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools.

(11) The pupil member shall not be liable for any acts of the governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools.

(12) A majority vote of all voting governing body regular members shall be required to approve a motion to eliminate the pupil member position from the governing
 body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools. The motion shall be listed as a public agenda item for a meeting of the governing body before the motion being voted upon.

(c) A pupil member of the governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools shall not be considered a member of a legislative body or a local agency for purposes of the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) or the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) The governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools that orders the inclusion of a pupil member within its governing body membership pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (b) shall do both of the following:

(1) (A) Notify the chartering authority of the charter school within 30 days of either of the following:

(i) The inclusion of the pupil member.

(ii) Any subsequent change in the pupil membership.

(B) The notification shall be in writing, include the name of the pupil member, the duration of the term of the pupil, and a copy of the approved pupil petition described in subdivision (b).

(2) Include at the next charter renewal with the chartering authority, the inclusion of the pupil member as a change to the governing body of the charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools.

(e) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Pupil member” means a pupil member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) “Regular member” means a governing body member nominated or appointed to the governing body of the charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools, consistent with Section 47605 or 47605.6, as applicable.

(f) This section shall prevail over any contrary provision in the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), or between this section and a nonprofit public benefit corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws, relating to pupil members on the governing body of the charter school or of an entity managing
 multiple charter schools. Nothing in this section otherwise alters, amends, or impairs the rights, duties, and obligations of a nonprofit public benefit corporation relating to the operation of a charter school.

(g) The requirements of this section shall not be waived by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 54.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

47604.3.

A charter school and an entity managing a charter school shall promptly respond to all reasonable inquiries, including, but not limited to, inquiries regarding its respective financial records and contracts, from its chartering authority, the county
 superintendent of schools
 that has jurisdiction over the charter school’s chartering authority, or from the Superintendent and shall consult with the chartering authority, the county superintendent of schools, or the Superintendent regarding any inquiries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 90.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

47604.32.

(a) Each chartering authority, in addition to any other duties imposed by this part, shall do all of the following with respect to each charter school under its authority:

(1) Identify at least one staff member as a contact person for the charter school.

(2) Visit each schoolsite approved in the charter petition or material revision that has been established by the charter school at least annually.

(3) Verify that each charter school under its authority complies with all reports required of charter schools by law, including the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan
 required pursuant to Section 47606.5.

(4) Monitor the fiscal condition, including enrollment and attendance data, and make periodic checks of credit and debit card transactions of each charter school under its authority.

(5) Provide the governing body of the charter school with feedback on any issues of concern identified pursuant to paragraph (4) and an opportunity to respond. If in the course of the review, the chartering authority has reasonable suspicion that fraud, misappropriations of public funds, embezzlement, or other financial crimes may be occurring, the chartering authority shall notify the Superintendent and the county superintendent of schools.

(6) Provide timely notification to the Superintendent if any of the following circumstances occurs or will occur with regard to a charter school for which it is
 the chartering authority:

(A) A renewal of the charter is granted or denied.

(B) The charter is revoked.

(C) The charter school will cease operation for any reason.

(7) Conduct annual financial and compliance audit review and oversight responsibilities pursuant to Section 41020.

(8) (A) Not later than July 1 of each year, identify and provide written and timely notification to the governing body of the charter school
 of any material concern arising out of the chartering authority’s ongoing oversight and monitoring activities during the previous 12 months.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “material concern” means a concern that could lead to a decision of non-renewal or revocation of the charter, such as concerns regarding any of the following:

(i) Academic performance expectations.

(ii) Compliance with laws, contracts, or the terms of the charter.

(iii) Issues with fiscal conditions or governance procedures.

(iv) Issues pertaining to pupil health, or employee or pupil safety.

(v) Issues pertaining to equity or accessibility.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2027, each chartering authority, in addition to any other duties imposed by this part, shall do all of the following with respect to each charter school under its authority:

(1) (A) Visit each resource center, meeting space, and satellite facility approved in a charter petition or material revision and established by the charter school (i) upon the opening and (ii) pursuant to subparagraph (B) thereafter.

(B) Visit each resource center, meeting space, and satellite facility approved in a charter petition or material revision and
 established by the charter school at least once every two years.

(2) Annually attend, in person, at least one meeting of the governing body of the charter school.

(3) Review the agendas and minutes of the meetings of the governing body of the charter school.

(4) Refer any credible allegations of fraud,
 misappropriation of funds, or other illegal fiscal practices received from third parties, or observed through the chartering authority’s duties, to the county superintendent of schools who may elect to exercise its authority pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1241.5, Section 47604.3, or Section 47604.4.

(c) (1) Commencing July 1, 2027, each chartering authority, in addition to any other duties imposed by this part, shall annually review, with respect to each nonclassroom-based charter school under its authority, the charter school’s average daily attendance. The chartering authority shall review a sample of independent study written agreements and work samples from each track to gauge whether the documents generally align with the reported attendance if the independent study average daily attendance reported by the charter school to the Superintendent for apportionment purposes has increased by 10 percent or more
 relative to the most recent prior principal apportionment reporting period, as defined in Section 41601, as follows:

(A) For the first principal reporting period compared to the prior year first principal reporting period.

(B) For the second principal reporting period compared to the current year first principal reporting period.

(C) For the annual principal reporting period compared to the current year second principal reporting period.

(2) If a review pursuant to paragraph (1) does not generally align with the reported attendance during the applicable apportionment reporting period, including subsequent corrected reports submitted to the chartering authority, the chartering authority shall request additional information to explain the
 misalignment.

(d) The cost of performing the duties required by this section shall be funded with supervisorial oversight fees collected pursuant to Section 47613.

(e) A charter school shall provide the chartering authority the necessary supporting documentation in order for the chartering authority to perform verification duties described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 608, Sec. 5.   (AB 2467)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

47604.33.

(a) Each charter school shall annually prepare and submit the following reports to its chartering authority and the county superintendent of schools, or only to the county superintendent of schools if the county board of education is the chartering authority:

(1) On or before July 1, a preliminary budget. For a charter school in its first year of operation, the information submitted pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 47605 satisfies this requirement.

(2) On or before July 1, a local control and accountability plan and an annual update to the local control and accountability plan required pursuant to Section 47606.5.

(3) On or
 before December 15, an interim financial report. This report shall reflect changes through October 31.

(4) On or before March 15, a second interim financial report. This report shall reflect changes through January 31.

(5) On or before September 15, a final unaudited report for the full prior year.

(b) The chartering authority shall use any financial or other information it obtains from the charter school, including, but not limited to, the reports required by this section, to perform the duties described in subdivision (a) of Section 47604.32, including monitoring the fiscal condition of the charter school.

(c) The cost of performing the duties required by this section shall be funded with supervisorial oversight fees collected pursuant to Section
 47613.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 66.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

47604.4.

(a) In addition to the authority granted by Sections 1241.5 and 47604.3, a county superintendent of schools may, based upon written complaints by parents or other information that justifies the investigation, monitor the operations of a charter school located within that county and conduct an investigation into the operations of that charter school. If a county superintendent of schools monitors or investigates a charter school pursuant to this section, the county office of education shall not incur any liability beyond the cost of the investigation.

(b) A charter school shall notify the county superintendent of schools of the county in which it is located of the location of the charter school, including the location of each site, if applicable, prior to commencing operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 357, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

47604.5.

The state board may, based upon the recommendation of the Superintendent, take appropriate action, including, but not limited to, revocation of the charter school’s charter, when the state board finds any of the following:

(a) Gross financial mismanagement that jeopardizes the financial stability of the charter school.

(b) Illegal or substantially improper use of charter school funds for the personal benefit of any officer, director, or fiduciary of the charter school.

(c) Substantial and sustained departure from measurably successful practices such that continued departure would jeopardize the educational development of the charter school’s pupils.

(d) Failure to improve pupil outcomes across multiple state and school priorities identified in the charter pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6.

(e) The requirements of this section shall not be waived by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 486, Sec. 1.   (AB 1505)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2020, pursuant to Sec. 18 of Stats. 2019, Ch. 486.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Establishment of Charter Schools [47605. - 47608.]

47605.

(a) (1) Except as set forth in paragraph (2), a petition for the establishment of a charter school within a school district may be circulated by one or more persons seeking to establish the charter school. A petition for the establishment of a charter school shall identify a single charter school that will operate within the geographic boundaries of that school district. A charter school may propose to operate at multiple sites within the school district if each location is identified in the charter school petition. The petition may be submitted to the governing board of the school district for review after either of the following conditions is met:

(A) The petition is signed by a number of parents or legal guardians of pupils that is
 equivalent to at least one-half of the number of pupils that the charter school estimates will enroll in the charter school for its first year of operation.

(B) The petition is signed by a number of teachers that is equivalent to at least one-half of the number of teachers that the charter school estimates will be employed at the charter school during its first year of operation.

(2) A petition that proposes to convert an existing public school to a charter school that would not be eligible for a loan pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 41365 may be circulated by one or more persons seeking to establish the charter school. The petition may be submitted to the governing board of the school district for review after the petition is signed by not less than 50 percent of the permanent status teachers currently employed at the public school to be converted.

(3) A petition shall include a prominent statement that a signature on the petition means that the parent or legal guardian is meaningfully interested in having their child or ward attend the charter school, or in the case of a teacher’s signature, means that the teacher is meaningfully interested in teaching at the charter school. The proposed charter shall be attached to the petition.

(4) After receiving approval of its petition, a charter school that proposes to expand operations to one or more additional sites or grade levels shall request a material revision to its charter and shall notify the chartering authority of those additional locations or grade levels. The chartering authority shall consider whether to approve those additional locations or grade levels at an open, public meeting. If the additional locations or grade levels are approved pursuant to the standards and
 criteria described in subdivision (c), they shall be a material revision to the charter school’s charter.

(5) (A) A charter school that established one site outside the boundaries of the school district, but within the county in which that school district is located before January 1, 2020, may continue to operate that site until the charter school submits a request for the renewal of its charter petition. To continue operating the site, the charter school shall do either of the following:

(i) First, before submitting the request for the renewal of the charter petition, obtain approval in writing from the school district where the site is operating.

(ii) Submit a request for the renewal of the charter petition pursuant to Section 47607 to the school district in which the charter school is
 located.

(B) If a Presidential declaration of a major disaster or emergency is issued in accordance with the federal Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.) for an area in which a charter schoolsite is located and operating, the charter school, for not more than five years, may relocate that site outside the area subject to the Presidential declaration if the charter school first obtains the written approval of the school district where the site is being relocated to.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), if a charter school was relocated from December 31, 2016, to December 31, 2019, inclusive, due to a Presidential declaration of a major disaster or emergency in accordance with the federal Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.), that charter school shall be allowed to
 return to its original campus location in perpetuity.

(D) (i) A charter school in operation and providing educational services to pupils before October 1, 2019, located on a federally recognized California Indian reservation or rancheria or operated by a federally recognized California Indian tribe shall be exempt from the geographic restrictions of paragraph (1) and subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and the geographic restrictions of subdivision (a) of Section 47605.1.

(ii) The exemption to the geographic restrictions of subdivision (a) of Section 47605.1 in clause (i) does not apply to nonclassroom-based charter schools operating pursuant to Section 47612.5.

(E) The department shall regard as a continuing charter school for all purposes a charter school that was granted approval of its
 petition, that was providing educational services to pupils before October 1, 2019, and is authorized by a different chartering authority due to changes to this paragraph that took effect January 1, 2020. This paragraph shall be implemented only to the extent it does not conflict with federal law. In order to prevent any potential conflict with federal law, this paragraph does not apply to covered programs as identified in Section 8101(11) of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 7801) to the extent the affected charter school is the restructured portion of a divided charter school pursuant to Section 47654.

(6) Commencing January 1, 2003, a petition to establish a charter school shall not be approved to serve pupils in a grade level that is not served by the school district of the governing board considering the petition, unless the petition proposes to serve pupils in all of the grade levels served by that
 school district.

(b) No later than 60 days after receiving a petition, in accordance with subdivision (a), the governing board of the school district shall hold a public hearing on the provisions of the charter, at which time the governing board of the school district shall consider the level of support for the petition by teachers employed by the school district, other employees of the school district, and parents. Following review of the petition and the public hearing, the governing board of the school district shall either grant or deny the charter within 90 days of receipt of the petition, provided, however, that the date may be extended by an additional 30 days if both parties agree to the extension. A petition is deemed received by the governing board of the school district for purposes of commencing the timelines described in this subdivision on the day the petitioner submits a petition to the district office, along with a signed
 certification that the petitioner deems the petition to be complete. The governing board of the school district shall publish all staff recommendations, including the recommended findings and, if applicable, the certification from the county superintendent of schools prepared pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (c), regarding the petition at least 15 days before the public hearing at which the governing board of the school district will either grant or deny the charter. At the public hearing at which the governing board of the school district will either grant or deny the charter, petitioners shall have equivalent time and procedures to present evidence and testimony to respond to the staff recommendations and findings.

(c) In reviewing petitions for the establishment of charter schools pursuant to this section, the chartering authority shall be guided by the intent of the Legislature that charter schools are and should become an integral
 part of the California educational system and that the establishment of charter schools should be encouraged. The governing board of the school district shall grant a charter for the operation of a school under this part if it is satisfied that granting the charter is consistent with sound educational practice and with the interests of the community in which the school is proposing to locate. The governing board of the school district shall consider the academic needs of the pupils the school proposes to serve. The governing board of the school district shall not deny a petition for the establishment of a charter school unless it makes written factual findings, specific to the particular petition, setting forth specific facts to support one or more of the following findings:

(1) The charter school presents an unsound educational program for the pupils to be enrolled in the charter school.

(2) The petitioners are demonstrably unlikely to successfully implement the program set forth in the petition.

(3) The petition does not contain the number of signatures required by subdivision (a).

(4) The petition does not contain an affirmation of each of the conditions described in subdivision (e).

(5) The petition does not contain reasonably comprehensive descriptions of all of the following:

(A) (i) The educational program of the charter school, designed, among other things, to identify those whom the charter school is attempting to educate, what it means to be an “educated person” in the 21st century, and how learning best occurs. The goals identified in that program shall include the objective of enabling
 pupils to become self-motivated, competent, and lifelong learners.

(ii) The annual goals for the charter school for all pupils and for each subgroup of pupils identified pursuant to Section 52052, to be achieved in the state priorities, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 52060, that apply for the grade levels served, and specific annual actions to achieve those goals. A charter petition may identify additional school priorities, the goals for the school priorities, and the specific annual actions to achieve those goals.

(iii) If the proposed charter school will serve high school pupils, the manner in which the charter school will inform parents about the transferability of courses to other public high schools and the eligibility of courses to meet college entrance requirements. Courses offered by the charter school that are accredited by the Western Association of Schools
 and Colleges may be considered transferable and courses approved by the University of California or the California State University as creditable under the “A to G” admissions criteria may be considered to meet college entrance requirements.

(B) The measurable pupil outcomes identified for use by the charter school. “Pupil outcomes,” for purposes of this part, means the extent to which all pupils of the charter school demonstrate that they have attained the skills, knowledge, and attitudes specified as goals in the charter school’s educational program. Pupil outcomes shall include outcomes that address increases in pupil academic achievement both schoolwide and for all pupil subgroups served by the charter school, as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 52052. The pupil outcomes shall align with the state priorities, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 52060, that apply for the grade levels served by the charter school.

(C) The method by which pupil progress in meeting those pupil outcomes is to be measured. To the extent practicable, the method for measuring pupil outcomes for state priorities shall be consistent with the way information is reported on a school accountability report card.

(D) The governance structure of the charter school, including, but not limited to, the process to be followed by the charter school to ensure parental involvement.

(E) The qualifications to be met by individuals to be employed by the charter school.

(F) The procedures that the charter school will follow to ensure the health and safety of pupils and staff. These procedures shall require all of the following:

(i) That each
 employee of the charter school furnish the charter school with a criminal record summary as described in Section 44237.

(ii) The development of a school safety plan, and the annual review and update of the plan, pursuant to Section 47606.3.

(G) The means by which the charter school will achieve a balance of racial and ethnic pupils, special education pupils, and English learner pupils, including redesignated fluent English proficient pupils, as defined by the evaluation rubrics in Section 52064.5, that is reflective of the general population residing within the territorial jurisdiction of the school district to which the charter petition is submitted. Upon renewal, for a charter school not deemed to be a local educational agency for purposes of special education pursuant to Section 47641, the chartering authority may consider the effect of school placements made by the chartering
 authority in providing a free and appropriate public education as required by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Public Law 101-476), on the balance of pupils with disabilities at the charter school.

(H) Admission policies and procedures, consistent with subdivision (e).

(I) The procedures by which pupils can be suspended or expelled from the charter school for disciplinary reasons or otherwise involuntarily removed from the charter school for any reason. These procedures, at a minimum, shall include an explanation of how the charter school will comply with federal and state constitutional procedural and substantive due process requirements that are consistent with all of the following:

(i) For suspensions of fewer than 10 days, provide oral or written notice of the charges against the pupil and, if the pupil denies the charges, an explanation of the evidence that supports the charges and an opportunity for the pupil to present the pupil’s side of the story.

(ii) For suspensions of 10 days or more and all other expulsions for disciplinary reasons, both of the following:

(I) Provide timely, written notice of the charges against the pupil and an explanation of the pupil’s basic rights.

(II) Provide a hearing adjudicated by a neutral officer within a reasonable number of days at which the pupil has a fair opportunity to present testimony, evidence, and witnesses and confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses, and at which the pupil has the right to bring legal counsel or an advocate.

(iii) Contain a clear statement that no pupil shall be involuntarily removed by the charter school for any reason unless the parent or guardian of the pupil has been provided written notice of intent to remove the pupil no less than five schooldays before the effective date of the action. The written notice shall be in the native language of the pupil or the pupil’s parent or guardian, or, if the pupil is a homeless child or youth, or a foster child or
 youth, in the native language of the homeless or foster child’s educational rights holder. In the case of a foster child or youth, the written notice shall also be provided to the foster child’s attorney and county social worker. If the pupil is an Indian child, as defined in Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the written notice shall also be provided to the Indian child’s tribal social worker and, if applicable, county social worker. The written notice shall inform the pupil, the pupil’s parent or guardian, the homeless child’s educational rights holder, the foster child’s educational rights holder, attorney, and county social worker, or the Indian child’s tribal social worker and, if applicable, county social worker of the right to initiate the procedures specified in clause (ii) before the effective date of the action. If the pupil’s parent or guardian, the homeless child’s educational rights holder, the foster child’s educational rights holder, attorney, or county social worker, or the
 Indian child’s tribal social worker or, if applicable, county social worker initiates the procedures specified in clause (ii), the pupil shall remain enrolled and shall not be removed until the charter school issues a final decision. For purposes of this clause, “involuntarily removed” includes disenrolled, dismissed, transferred, or terminated, but does not include suspensions specified in clauses (i) and (ii).

(iv) A foster child’s educational rights holder, attorney, and county social worker and an Indian child’s tribal social worker and, if applicable, county social worker shall have the same rights a parent or guardian of a child has to receive a suspension notice, expulsion notice, manifestation determination notice, involuntary transfer notice, and other documents and related information.

(J) The manner by which staff members of the charter schools will be covered by the State Teachers’ Retirement System, the Public Employees’ Retirement System, or federal social security.

(K) The public school attendance alternatives for pupils residing within the school district who choose not to attend charter schools.

(L) The rights of an employee of the school district upon leaving the employment of the school district to work in a charter school, and of any rights of return to the school district after employment at a charter school.

(M) The procedures to be followed by the charter school and the chartering authority to resolve disputes relating to provisions of the charter.

(N) The procedures to be used if the charter school closes. The procedures shall ensure a final audit of the charter school to determine the disposition of all assets and liabilities of the charter school, including plans for disposing of any net assets and for the maintenance and transfer of pupil records.

(6) The petition does not contain a declaration of whether or not the charter school shall be deemed the exclusive public employer of the employees of the charter school for purposes of Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(7) The charter school is demonstrably unlikely to serve the interests of the entire community in which the school is proposing to
 locate. Analysis of this finding shall include consideration of the fiscal impact of the proposed charter school. A written factual finding under this paragraph shall detail specific facts and circumstances that analyze and consider the following factors:

(A) The extent to which the proposed charter school would substantially undermine existing services, academic offerings, or programmatic offerings.

(B) Whether the proposed charter school would duplicate a program currently offered within the school district and the existing program has sufficient capacity for the pupils proposed to be served within reasonable proximity to where the charter school intends to locate.

(8) The school district is not positioned to absorb the fiscal impact of the proposed charter school. A school district satisfies this paragraph if it
 has a qualified interim certification pursuant to Section 42131 and the county superintendent of schools, in consultation with the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team, certifies that approving the charter school would result in the school district having a negative interim certification pursuant to Section 42131, has a negative interim certification pursuant to Section 42131, or is under state receivership. Charter schools proposed in a school district satisfying one of these conditions shall be subject to a rebuttable presumption of denial.

(d) (1) Charter schools shall meet all statewide standards and conduct the pupil assessments required pursuant to Section 60605 and any other statewide standards authorized in statute or pupil assessments applicable to pupils in noncharter public schools.

(2) Charter schools shall, on a regular
 basis, consult with their parents, legal guardians, and teachers regarding the charter school’s educational programs.

(e) (1) In addition to any other requirement imposed under this part, a charter school shall be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, shall not charge tuition, and shall not discriminate against a pupil on the basis of the characteristics listed in Section 220. Except as provided in paragraph (2), admission to a charter school shall not be determined according to the place of residence of the pupil, or of that pupil’s parent or legal guardian, within this state, except that an existing public school converting partially or entirely to a charter school under this part shall adopt and maintain a policy giving admission preference to pupils who reside within the former attendance area of that public school.

(2) (A) A charter school shall admit all pupils who wish to attend the charter school.

(B) If the number of pupils who wish to attend the charter school exceeds the charter school’s capacity, attendance, except for existing pupils of the charter school, shall be determined by a public random drawing. Preference shall be extended to pupils currently attending the charter school and pupils who reside in the school district except as provided for in Section 47614.5. Preferences, including, but not limited to, siblings of pupils admitted or attending the charter school and children of the charter school’s teachers, staff, and founders identified in the initial charter, may also be permitted by the chartering authority on an individual charter school basis. Priority order for any preference shall be determined in the charter petition in accordance with all of the
 following:

(i) Each type of preference shall be approved by the chartering authority at a public hearing.

(ii) Preferences shall be consistent with federal law, the California Constitution, and Section 200.

(iii) Preferences shall not result in limiting enrollment access for pupils with disabilities, academically
 low achieving pupils, English learners, neglected or delinquent pupils, homeless pupils, or pupils who are economically disadvantaged, as determined by eligibility for any free or reduced-price meal program, foster youth, or pupils based on nationality, race, ethnicity, or sexual orientation.

(iv) In accordance with Section 49011, preferences shall not require mandatory parental volunteer hours as a criterion for admission or continued enrollment.

(C) In the event of a drawing, the chartering authority shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the growth of the charter school and shall not take any action to impede the charter school from expanding enrollment to meet pupil demand.

(3) If a pupil is expelled or leaves the charter school without graduating or completing the
 school year for any reason, the charter school shall notify the superintendent of the school district of the pupil’s last known address within 30 days, and shall, upon request, provide that school district with a copy of the cumulative record of the pupil, including report cards or a transcript of grades, and health information. If the pupil is subsequently expelled or leaves the school district without graduating or completing the school year for any reason, the school district shall provide this information to the charter school within 30 days if the charter school demonstrates that the pupil had been enrolled in the charter school. This paragraph applies only to pupils subject to compulsory full-time education pursuant to Section 48200.

(4) (A) A charter school shall not discourage a pupil from enrolling or seeking to enroll in the charter school for any reason, including, but not limited to, academic performance of the
 pupil or because the pupil exhibits any of the characteristics described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(B) A charter school shall not request a pupil’s records or require a parent, guardian, or pupil to submit the pupil’s records to the charter school before enrollment.

(C) A charter school shall not encourage a pupil currently attending the charter school to disenroll from the charter school or transfer to another school for any reason, including, but not limited to, academic performance of the pupil or because the pupil exhibits any of the characteristics described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2). This subparagraph shall not apply to actions taken by a charter school pursuant to the procedures described in subparagraph
 (I) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c).

(D) The department shall develop a notice of the requirements of this paragraph. This notice shall be posted on a charter school’s internet website. A charter school shall provide a parent or guardian, or a pupil if the pupil is 18 years of age or older, a copy of this notice at all of the following times:

(i) When a parent, guardian, or pupil inquires about enrollment.

(ii) Before conducting an enrollment lottery.

(iii) Before disenrollment of a pupil.

(E) (i) A person who suspects that a charter school has violated this paragraph may file a complaint with the chartering
 authority.

(ii) The department shall develop a template to be used for filing complaints pursuant to clause (i).

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, a charter school in operation as of July 1, 2019, that operates in partnership with the California National Guard may dismiss a pupil from the charter school for failing to maintain the minimum standards of conduct required by the Military Department.

(6) A charter school shall, at a governing body meeting, obtain the approval of the governing body of the charter school for any contract that would cause the charter school to compensate an individual contractor more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in a fiscal year.

(f) The governing board of a school district shall not require an employee of the school district to be employed in a charter school.

(g) The governing board of a school district shall not require a pupil enrolled in the school district to attend a charter school.
